Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2773.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 5 TLSB 6870HV (1) 91 da/js H.F. 2773 Section 1. Section 468.186, Code 2026, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 1A. a. The governing body of a drainage 3 or levee district shall not charge an administrative fee 4 related to the consideration, approval, or disapproval of an 5 application for an easement to install fiber optic cable by 6 a person whose business is primarily locally operated as a 7 contractor or fiber optic network company. 8 b. The drainage district may prepare and publish a list of 9 the names of persons described in paragraph âaâ that will not be 10 charged the administrative fee. 11 Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE. This Act, being deemed of immediate 12 importance, takes effect upon enactment. 13